Vermont statutes. Title 13 Crimes and Criminal Procedure
Subchapter 1. Generally

§ 7001.
Conviction by court having jurisdiction.

A person shall not be punished for an offense unless he or she is convicted thereof in a court having jurisdiction of the cause and the person.

§ 7002.
Conviction to be by plea, verdict, or judgment.

A person shall not be punished for an offense unless by confession of his or her guilt in open court, or by admitting the truth of the charge against him or her by his or her plea or demurrer, or by the verdict of a jury accepted by the court and recorded, or by the judgment of a Criminal Division of the Superior Court when the respondent waives trial by jury.

HISTORY:

Amended 1965, No. 194, § 10, operative February 1, 1967; 1973, No. 249 (Adj. Sess.), § 55, eff. April 9, 1974; 2009, No. 154, § 238.

§ 7003.
Repealed.
1973, No. 118, § 25, eff. Oct. 1, 1973.

§ 7004.
Record of convictions; report to Commissioner of Public Safety.

In all cases of felony or misdemeanor in which a conviction or plea of guilty is had in their respective courts, clerks of the Superior Court shall forthwith forward to the Commissioner of Public Safety, on quadruplicate forms to be furnished by him or her, for file in the identification and records division of the Department of Public Safety, a certified report of the conviction, together with the sentence and any other facts that may be required by the Commissioner. A fee of $0.50 for such certified report shall be allowed by the Commissioner of Finance and Management in settlement of the accounts of such courts.

HISTORY:

Amended 1959, No. 329 (Adj. Sess.), § 8; 1965, No. 194, § 10, operative February 1, 1967; 1973, No. 193 (Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. April 9, 1974; 1973, No. 249 (Adj. Sess.), § 56, eff. April 9, 1974; 2009, No. 154 (Adj. Sess.), § 112.

§ 7005.
Repealed.
1963, No. 83.

§ 7006.
Repealed. 1999, No. 4, § 7.